Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4126
Limitations on obtaining and using samples.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(1) No DNA sample shall be obtained from any person for any law enforcement purpose in connection with an investigation of a crime without probable cause, a court order, or voluntary consent as described in subdivision (2) of this section;

(2) In the absence of probable cause, if any person is requested by a law enforcement person or agency to consent to the taking of a DNA sample in connection with a law enforcement investigation of a particular crime, such consent shall be deemed voluntary only if:

(a) The sample is knowingly and voluntarily given in connection with the investigation of a particular crime;

(b) The person was informed by a written advisory prepared by the law enforcement agency that the request may be refused and that such refusal does not provide probable cause or reasonable suspicion to believe that the person has committed a crime, and the person signs the advisory; and

(c) No threat, pressure, duress, or coercion of any kind was employed, whether (i) direct or indirect, (ii) express or implied, or (iii) physical or psychological;

(3) Any DNA sample obtained in violation of this section is not admissible in any proceeding for any purpose whatsoever;

(4) A person shall be notified in writing by the law enforcement agency immediately upon the determination that he or she has not been implicated by his or her DNA sample in the commission of the particular crime in connection with which the DNA sample was obtained;

(5) Except as authorized in subdivision (7) of this section, such sample and all identifying information pertaining to the person shall be delivered to the person within ten days after the notification required by subdivision (4) of this section with a written explanation that the materials are being turned over in compliance with this section;

(6) Except as authorized in subdivision (7) of this section, the law enforcement agency shall purge all records and identifiable information pertaining to the person specified in subdivisions (4) and (5) of this section;

(7) An accredited laboratory authorized to perform DNA testing under section 29-4105 shall be allowed to maintain the minimum records and supporting documentation of DNA tests that it has performed as needed for the sole purpose of complying with the laboratory accreditation standards as set forth by a national accrediting body or public agency;

(8) No record authorized for retention under subdivision (7) of this section shall be transferred, shared, or otherwise provided to any national, state, county, or local law enforcement agency unless such person has been implicated in the case by his or her DNA sample;

(9) Any aggrieved person may file an action in district court against any person, including any law enforcement agency, to enjoin such person or law enforcement agency from violating this section; and

(10) Any person aggrieved by a knowing violation of this section may bring an action in district court for damages. A person found by the court to be aggrieved by a violation of this section shall receive damages of not less than one thousand dollars and may recover reasonable costs and attorney's fees.

For purposes of this section, DNA means deoxyribonucleic acid.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 34.